tr: Kum torbası tarzı: Bulgarian; Core; Dolgu kılıfı; Yakıt bidonu; Plaka eklentisi; Power; Strongman; Atış; Su dolu; Diğer
fi: Hiekkasäkin tyyli: Bulgarialainen; Core; Täyttöpussi; Jerrykannu; Levypaino-osa; Power; Strongman; Heittosäkki; Vedellä täytettävä; Muu
sk-SK: Štýl závažia s pieskom: Bulharské; Jadro; Plniaci rukáv; Bandaska; Vložka s kotúčmi; Power; Strongman; Vrhacie; Plnené vodou; Iné
es: Estilo de bolsa de arena: Búlgaro; Core; Funda de relleno; Bidón; Inserto para discos; Potencia; Strongman; Lanzamiento; Lleno de agua; Otro
ja: サンドバッグスタイル: ブルガリアン; コア; フィラースリーブ; ジェリカン; プレートインサート; パワー; ストロングマン; スローイング; 水充填式; その他
hu: Homokzsák stílusa: Bolgár; Core; Töltőzsák; Benzineskanna formájú; Súlytárcsás; Power; Erősember; Dobó; Vízzel töltött; Egyéb
nb: Sandsekkstil: Bulgarsk; Core; Fyllpose; Jerrykanne; Vektskiveinnsats; Power; Strongman; Kasting; Vannfylt; Annet
nl: Zandzak stijl: Bulgaars; Core; Vulhoes; Jerrycan; Schijf-insert; Power; Strongman; Werpen; Met water gevuld; Overige
da: Sandsæks stil: Bulgarian; Core; Fyldpose; Jerrycan; Vægtskiveindsats; Power; Strongman; Kaste; Vandfyldt; Andet
ko: 샌드백 방식: 불가리안; 코어; 필러 슬리브; 제리 캔; 플레이트 인서트; 파워; 스트롱맨; 스로잉; 물 채움형; 기타
zh-TW: 沙袋樣式: 保加利亞式; 核心; 填充套; 油桶型; 槓片插入式; 力量; 大力士式; 投擲式; 充水式; 其他
ro-RO: Stilul sacului de nisip: Bulgar; Core; Sac de umplere; Canistră; Inserție pentru discuri; Power; Strongman; Pentru aruncare; Umplut cu apă; Altele
de: Sandsackstil: Bulgarian Bag; Core-Sandbag; Füllschlauch; Kanister; Scheibeneinsatz; Power-Sandbag; Strongman-Sandbag; Wurfsack; Wassergefüllt; Sonstige
sv: Sandsäcksstil: Bulgarian; Core; Påfyllningspåse; Dunk; Viktplatteinsats; Power; Strongman; Kast; Vattenfylld; Övrigt
cs: Styl pytle s pískem: Bulharský; Core; Plnicí vak; Jerry can; S vložkou na kotouče; Power; Strongman; Vrhací; Plněné vodou; Jiné
fr: Type de sac d’entraînement lesté: Bulgare; Core; Housse de remplissage; Jerrican; Insert pour disque; Power; Strongman; Lancer; Rempli d’eau; Autre
hr-HR: Stil vreće s pijeskom: Bugarski; Core; Rukav za punjenje; Kanistar; Uložak s pločom; Power; Strongman; Za bacanje; Punjeno vodom; Ostalo
en: Sandbag style: Bulgarian; Core; Filler sleeve; Jerry can; Plate insert; Power; Strongman; Throwing; Water filled; Other
zh-CN: 沙袋样式: 保加利亚式; 核心式; 填充套筒式; 油桶式; 负重片插入式; 力量式; 大力士专用; 投掷式; 注水式; 其他
th: แบบกระสอบทราย: บัลแกเรียน; คอร์; ปลอกใส่ถุงทราย; ทรงแกลลอนน้ำมัน; ใส่แผ่นน้ำหนัก; พาวเวอร์; สตรองแมน; สำหรับขว้าง; เติมน้ำ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Стил на пясъчен чувал: Българска; За ядрото; Ръкав за пълнене; Тип туба; За тежести; Силова; Стронгмен; За хвърляне; Водна; Друго
ru: Стиль мешка с песком: Болгарский; Для кора; Мешок-филлер; В форме канистры; С утяжелительными пластинами; Силовой; Стронгмен; Для бросков; Наполняемый водой; Другой
pt-BR: Saco de areia, estilo: Búlgara; Core; Cápsula de enchimento; Galão; Inserção de placa; Power; Strongman; Lançamento; Preenchido com água; Outros
sl-SI: Stil utežne vreče s peskom: Bolgarska; Za jedro; Rokav za polnjenje; Ročka; Vložek s ploščami; Moč; Strongman; Za metanje; Napolnjeno z vodo; Drugo
vi: Kiểu bao cát: Kiểu Bulgaria; Core; Ống lót (Filler sleeve); Can nhựa (Jerry can); Có khay gắn tạ đĩa; Power; Strongman; Ném; Đổ đầy nước; Khác
lt-LT: Smėlio maišo stilius: Bulgariškas; Korpuso; Su vidiniais maišais; Kanistras; Su svorių plokštėmis; Jėgos; Galiūnų; Metimo; Pripildytas vandens; Kita
el: Στιλ σάκου άμμου: Βουλγάρικος; Κορμού (Core); Με εσωτερικό σάκο (Filler sleeve); Σε σχήμα μπιτονιού (Jerry can); Με υποδοχή για δίσκους; Power; Strongman; Ρίψεων (Throwing); Γεμισμένος με νερό; Άλλο
it: Stile del sacco da sabbia: Bulgara; Core; Borsa riempitiva (Filler sleeve); A tanica (Jerry can); Inserto per piastra; Power; Strongman; Da lancio; Ad acqua; Altro
pl: Styl worka treningowego z piaskiem: Bułgarski; Core; Rękaw wypełniający; Kanister; Z wkładką na obciążenia; Power; Strongman; Do rzucania; Wypełniany wodą; Inne
pt-PT: Estilo do saco de areia: Búlgaro; Core; Manga de enchimento; Jerrican; Inserção de disco; Power; Strongman; Lançamento; Cheio de água; Outro